District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.29e

Requirements for private vehicle-for-hire operators.

(a)

A private vehicle-for-hire operator shall:

(1)

Accept only rides booked through a private vehicle-for-hire company’s digital dispatch and shall not solicit or accept street hails;

(2)

Use the trade dress required by § 50-301.29d at any time that the operator is logged into a private vehicle-for-hire company’s digital dispatch;

(3)

Possess a valid driver’s license issued by the District of Columbia, the State of Maryland, or the Commonwealth of Virginia;

(4)

Possess proof of personal motor vehicle insurance for the motor vehicle used as a private vehicle-for-hire; and

(5)

Be at least 21 years of age.

(b)

If an accident occurs involving a motor vehicle that is logged into the private vehicle-for-hire’s digital dispatch, the private vehicle-for-hire operator or company shall provide law enforcement officials and insurance representatives with proof of the insurance required by § 50-301.29c.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20j-5
as added Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(k), 61 DCR 12430

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.